Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 27. Child Support Services Agency.
Sec. 25.27.260.
Civil liability upon failure to comply with an order or lien.

If a person, political subdivision, or department of the state (1) fails to make an answer to an order to withhold and deliver within the time prescribed in AS

25.27.250

; (2) fails or refuses to deliver property in accordance with an order issued under AS

25.27.250

; (3) pays over, releases, sells, transfers, or conveys real property subject to a lien recorded under AS

25.27.230

to or for the benefit of the obligor or any other person; (4) fails or refuses to surrender upon demand property attached; or (5) intentionally fails or refuses to honor an assignment of wages or an income withholding order under AS

25.27.062

that was served by the agency through personal service by a process server or through certified mail, return receipt requested, the person, political subdivision, or department of the state is liable to the agency in an amount equal to 100 percent of the amount constituting the basis of the lien, order to withhold and deliver, attachment, or withholding of wages or income, together with costs, interest, and reasonable attorney fees.

A person, political subdivision, or department of the state that intentionally fails or refuses to honor a properly served income withholding order under AS

25.27.062

that is not being enforced by the agency is liable to the obligee in an amount equal to 100 percent of the amount ordered to be withheld together with costs, interest, and reasonable attorney fees.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 10 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 14 ch 40 SLA 1985; am §§ 30, 31 ch 7 FSSLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.260. Renumbered in 1990. Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 25.27.265.
Method of service; notification of change of address.

Except as otherwise provided under this chapter, when a notice, paper, or other document is required by this chapter to be given or served upon a person by the agency, the notice, paper, or other document may be served as required by Rule 5, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure or any other method permitted by law.

Each party to a paternity or child support proceeding shall file with the tribunal and inform the agency of the party’s name, location, social security number, residential and mailing addresses, telephone number, and driver’s license number, as well as the name, address, and telephone number of any employer of the party. If a change in this information occurs, the party shall immediately notify the tribunal and the agency and provide updated information.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if a tribunal finds that the agency has made diligent efforts to give or serve a notice, paper, or other document required by this chapter, the tribunal may order that service in any subsequent child support enforcement effort by the agency may be given upon the party by sending the document by first class mail to the party’s most recent mailing address on file with the agency.

History.

(§ 11 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 9 ch 72 SLA 1986; am §§ 131, 132 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.265. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 144, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for effect of subsection (c) on court rules, see § 153, ch. 87, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.27.270.
Judicial relief from administrative execution.

Any person against whose property a lien has been recorded under AS

25.27.230

or an order to withhold and deliver served in accordance with AS

25.27.250

may apply for relief to the superior court.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.270. Renumbered in 1990. Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 25.27.273.
Reporting of payment information concerning delinquent obligors.

The agency may provide to credit bureaus or lending institutions of any kind information about delinquent support owed by obligors. The information provided must consist solely of the payment history of the obligor.

Upon an obligor’s payment of delinquent support, the agency shall immediately notify all credit bureaus and lending institutions that were furnished information about the obligor under (a) of this section that the obligor is no longer delinquent.

History.

(§ 12 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 10 ch 72 SLA 1986; am § 133 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.273. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 144, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.27.275.
Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances.

Upon a finding, which may be made ex parte, that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be unreasonably put at risk by the disclosure of identifying information, or if an existing order so provides, a tribunal shall order that the address of the party or child or other identifying information not be disclosed in a pleading or other document filed in a proceeding under this chapter. A person aggrieved by an order of nondisclosure issued under this section that is based on an ex parte finding is entitled on request to a formal hearing, within 30 days of when the order was issued, at which the person may contest the order.

History.

(§ 11 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 134 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.275. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 25.27.278.
Payments not disbursed.

Support payments collected and held by the agency for seven years without disbursal shall be returned to the obligor.

History.

(§ 16 ch 40 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.278. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.279.
Voiding of fraudulent transfers made to avoid payment of child support.

In addition to the rights provided in AS

09.25.060

, if a transfer of personal or real property is made by an obligor without immediate delivery and the actual continuing change of possession of the property transferred, the transfer of the property is presumed prima facie to be fraud against creditors for child support of the obligor who transferred the property and subsequent purchasers in good faith and for valuable consideration during the time the property remains in the possession of the obligor who made the transfer, except that retention of possession in good faith and current course of trade by a merchant seller for a commercially reasonable time after the sale or identification is not fraudulent. Nothing contained in this section supersedes the provisions of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code).

History.

(§ 135 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 25.27.280.
Severability: Alternative when method of notification held invalid.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of it to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.
If any method of notification provided for in this chapter is held invalid, service as provided for by the laws of the state for service of process in a civil action shall be substituted for the method held invalid.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.280. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.300.
Requests pertaining to remarriage.

The agency shall, at the request of a person who is an obligor under a support order enforced by the agency that includes support for a parent with whom a child is living or at the request of a child support enforcement agency of another jurisdiction that is enforcing a support order that includes support for a parent with whom a child is living, request the Bureau of Vital Statistics to disclose to the agency whether the parent has remarried in the state after a specified date if the support order provides that the support for the parent is payable only until the parent remarries. The agency may disclose to the obligor or other child support enforcement agency, as applicable, the information provided by the bureau.

History.

(§ 48 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.27.320.
Interest on agency return of certain overpayments.

If the agency disburses money to an obligor because the agency made an error and mistakenly required the obligor to overpay under a support order enforced by the agency, the agency shall include interest with the disbursement at the rate of six percent a year. The interest accrues from the date the payment at issue was received by the agency, regardless of when the payment is determined to be an overpayment.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to situations where the agency is ordered by a court to return money to an obligor based on the obligor’s being the prevailing party in a court action.

History.

(§ 2 ch 46 SLA 2000)

Sec. 25.27.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“agency” means the child support services agency;

“arrearage” means a debt that is past due and equal to at least one monthly obligation under the support order for one or more of the following:

monetary support;

cash medical support;

payment of health care costs or maintenance of health insurance;

reimbursement of related costs;

payment of attorney fees and legal costs and other fees;

penalty, interest, and other relief as required by a support order;

“assistance under AS 47.27,” “assistance granted under AS 47.27,” or “assistance paid on behalf of the obligee under AS 47.27” means cash assistance provided under AS 47.27 (Alaska temporary assistance program);

“business day” means a day on which state government offices are open for regular business;

“department” means the Department of Revenue;

“duty of support” includes a duty of support imposed or imposable by law, by a court order, decree, or judgment, or by a finding or decision rendered under this chapter whether interlocutory or final, whether incidental to a proceeding for divorce, legal separation, separate maintenance, or otherwise, and includes the duty to pay arrearages of support past due and unpaid together with penalties and interest on arrearages imposed under AS

25.27.020(a)(2)(B)

and the duty to provide health care coverage in compliance with AS

25.27.060(c)

and

25.27.063

;

“earnings” includes income from any form of periodic payment due to an individual, regardless of source; the gain derived from the investment of capital, from labor, or from a combination of investment and labor; and the interest on any of this income; in this paragraph, “periodic payment” includes wages, salaries, commissions, bonuses, workers’ compensation, disability benefits, and payments under a pension or retirement program;

“employer” means an individual or entity within the meaning given that term in 26 U.S.C. 3401(d); “employer” includes a governmental entity or a labor organization;

“high-volume automated administrative enforcement” means the use of automatic data processing to search various state data bases, including license records, employment service data, and state new-hire registries, to determine whether information is available regarding a parent who owes a child support obligation;

“obligee” means a person to whom a duty of support is owed;

“obligor” means a person owing a duty of support;

“support order” means any judgment, decree, or order that is issued by a tribunal for the support and maintenance of a child or of a parent with whom the child is living; “support order” includes a judgment, decree, or order

on behalf of a child who has reached the age of majority if the judgment, decree, or order was lawfully issued; and

for any or all of the following:

monetary support, including arrearages;

payment of health care costs or maintenance of health insurance;

payment of cash medical support;

reimbursement of related costs;

payment of attorney fees and legal costs and other fees; or

penalty, interest, and other relief as required by a tribunal;

“tribunal” means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage.

History.

(§ 1 ch 251 SLA 1976; am §§ 27, 28 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 9 ch 118 SLA 1982; am § 133 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 11, 12 ch 72 SLA 1986; am §§ 136 — 139 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 49, 50 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 20, 21 ch 106 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 69 SLA 2002; am §§ 9, 10 ch 45 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.110. Renumbered as AS 47.23.900 and reorganized to alphabetize the terms defined in 1984. Renumbered again in 1990 and 1997. Paragraphs (2) and (9) [formerly (8)] were enacted as (11) and (12), respectively. Renumbered in 1998, at which time former paragraphs (2)-(6) were renumbered as (3)-(7) [now (4)-(8)] and former paragraphs (7)-(10) were renumbered as (9)-(12) [now (10)-(13)]. Paragraph (3) was enacted as (13); renumbered in 2002, at which time former paragraphs (3)-(12) were renumbered as (4)-(13).

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, repealed and reenacted (2), which read, “ ‘arrearage’ means a debt for support that is past due and equal to at least one monthly obligation under the support order”; amended (12), adding (12)(B)(iii), and redesignating former (iii), (iv), and (v) as (iv), (v), and (vi).